Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Form and Effect of Deeds of Trust; Sales Thereunder; Assignments; Releases.
§ 55.1-339.
Release of deed of trust or other lien.

As used in this section:“Deed of trust” means any mortgage, deed of trust, or vendor’s lien.“Judgment lien” includes a judgment lien prescribed by §

8.01-458

but does not include any lien in favor of the federal, state, or local government, or any political subdivision thereof.“Lien creditor” and “creditor” shall be construed as synonymous and mean the holder, payee, or obligee of a note, bond, or other evidence of debt and shall embrace the lien creditor or his successor in interest as evidenced by proper endorsement or assignment, general or restrictive, upon the note, bond, or other evidence of debt.“Payoff letter” means a written communication from the lien creditor or servicer stating, at a minimum, the amount outstanding and required to be paid to satisfy the obligation.“RESA” means Chapter 10 (§

55.1-1000

et seq.), Real Estate Settlement Agents.“Satisfactory evidence of the payment of the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien” means (i) any one of (a) the original canceled check or a copy of the canceled check, showing all endorsements, payable to the lien creditor or servicer, as applicable, (b) confirmation in written or electronic form of a wire transfer to the bank account of the lien creditor or servicer, as applicable, or (c) a bank statement in written or electronic form reflecting completion of the wire transfer or negotiation of the check, as applicable, and (ii) a payoff letter or other reasonable documentary evidence that the payment was to effect satisfaction of the obligation secured or evidenced by the deed of trust or judgment lien.“Satisfied by payment” includes obtaining written confirmation from the lien creditor that the underlying obligation has a zero balance.“Servicer” means a person or entity that collects loan payments on behalf of a lien creditor.“Settlement agent” has the same meaning ascribed to it in §

55.1-1000

, provided that a person shall not be a settlement agent unless he is registered pursuant to §

55.1-1014

and otherwise fully in compliance with the applicable provisions of RESA.“Title insurance company” has the same meaning ascribed to it in §

38.2-4601

, provided that the title insurance company seeking to release a lien by the process described in subsection E issued a policy of title insurance, through a title insurance agency or agent as defined in §

38.2-4601.1

, for a real estate transaction wherein the loan secured by the lien was satisfied by payment made by the title insurance agency or agent also acting as the settlement agent.

Except as provided in Article 3 (§

55.1-346

et seq.), after full or partial payment or satisfaction has been made of a debt secured by a deed of trust, vendor’s lien, or other lien, or any one or more obligations representing at least 25 percent of the total amount secured by such lien, but less than the total number of the obligations so secured, or the debt secured is evidenced by two or more separate written obligations sufficiently described in the instrument creating the lien, has been fully paid, the lien creditor shall issue a certificate of satisfaction or certificate of partial satisfaction in a form sufficient for recordation reflecting such payment and release of lien. This requirement shall apply to a credit line deed of trust prepared pursuant to §

55.1-318

only when the obligor or the settlement agent has paid the debt in full and requested that the instrument be released.If the lien creditor receives notice from a settlement agent at the address identified in its payoff statement requesting that the certificate be sent to such settlement agent, the lien creditor shall provide the certificate within 90 days after receipt of such notice to the settlement agent at the address specified in the notice received from the settlement agent.If the notice is not received from a settlement agent, the lien creditor shall deliver, within 90 days after such payment, the certificate to the appropriate clerk’s office with the necessary fee for recording by certified mail, return receipt requested, or when there is written proof of receipt from the clerk’s office, by hand delivery, electronic delivery via the clerk’s electronic filing system, or delivery by a commercial overnight delivery service or the United States Postal Service, and a receipt obtained.If the lien creditor has already delivered the certificate to the clerk’s office by the time it receives notice from the settlement agent, the lien creditor shall deliver a copy of the certificate to the settlement agent within 90 days of the receipt of the notice at the address for notification set forth in the payoff statement.Except as provided for judgment lien creditors in §

8.01-454

, if the lien creditor has not, within 90 days after payment, either provided the certificate of satisfaction to the settlement agent or delivered it to the clerk’s office with the necessary fee for filing, the lien creditor shall forfeit $500 to the lien obligor. No settlement agent or attorney may take an assignment of the right to the $500 penalty or facilitate such an assignment to any third party designated by the settlement agent or attorney. Following the 90-day period, if the amount forfeited is not paid within 10 business days after written demand for payment is sent to the lien creditor by certified mail at the address for notification set forth in the payoff statement, the lien creditor shall pay any court costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the obligor in collecting the forfeiture.
B. 1. Except as provided in Article 3 (§

55.1-346

et seq.), after full or partial payment or satisfaction has been made of a debt secured by a deed of trust, vendor’s lien, or other lien, or any one or more obligations representing at least 25 percent of the total amount secured by such lien, but less than the total number of the obligations so secured, or the debt secured is evidenced by two or more separate written obligations sufficiently described in the instrument creating the lien, has been fully paid, the lien creditor shall issue a certificate of satisfaction or certificate of partial satisfaction in a form sufficient for recordation reflecting such payment and release of lien. This requirement shall apply to a credit line deed of trust prepared pursuant to §

55.1-318

only when the obligor or the settlement agent has paid the debt in full and requested that the instrument be released.If the lien creditor receives notice from a settlement agent at the address identified in its payoff statement requesting that the certificate be sent to such settlement agent, the lien creditor shall provide the certificate within 90 days after receipt of such notice to the settlement agent at the address specified in the notice received from the settlement agent.If the notice is not received from a settlement agent, the lien creditor shall deliver, within 90 days after such payment, the certificate to the appropriate clerk’s office with the necessary fee for recording by certified mail, return receipt requested, or when there is written proof of receipt from the clerk’s office, by hand delivery, electronic delivery via the clerk’s electronic filing system, or delivery by a commercial overnight delivery service or the United States Postal Service, and a receipt obtained.If the lien creditor has already delivered the certificate to the clerk’s office by the time it receives notice from the settlement agent, the lien creditor shall deliver a copy of the certificate to the settlement agent within 90 days of the receipt of the notice at the address for notification set forth in the payoff statement.Except as provided for judgment lien creditors in §

8.01-454

, if the lien creditor has not, within 90 days after payment, either provided the certificate of satisfaction to the settlement agent or delivered it to the clerk’s office with the necessary fee for filing, the lien creditor shall forfeit $500 to the lien obligor. No settlement agent or attorney may take an assignment of the right to the $500 penalty or facilitate such an assignment to any third party designated by the settlement agent or attorney. Following the 90-day period, if the amount forfeited is not paid within 10 business days after written demand for payment is sent to the lien creditor by certified mail at the address for notification set forth in the payoff statement, the lien creditor shall pay any court costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the obligor in collecting the forfeiture.

If the note, bond, or other evidence of debt secured by such deed of trust, vendor’s lien, or other lien referred to in subdivision 1 or any interest therein has been assigned or transferred to a party other than the original lien creditor, the subsequent holder shall be subject to the same requirements as a lien creditor for failure to comply with this subsection, as set forth in subdivision 1.

The certificate of satisfaction shall be signed by the creditor or his duly authorized agent, attorney, or attorney-in-fact or any person to whom the instrument evidencing the indebtedness has been endorsed or assigned for the purpose of effecting such release. An affidavit shall be filed or recorded with the certificate of satisfaction by the creditor, or his duly authorized agent, attorney, or attorney-in-fact, with such clerk, stating that the debt therein secured and intended to be released or discharged has been paid to such creditor or his agent, attorney, or attorney-in-fact, who was entitled and authorized to receive such debt when the debt was satisfied.

When the certificate of satisfaction has been signed and the affidavit required by subsection C has been duly filed or recorded with the certificate of satisfaction with such clerk, the certificate of satisfaction shall operate as a release of the encumbrance as to which such payment or satisfaction is entered and, if the encumbrance is by deed of trust, as a reconveyance of the legal title as fully and effectually as if such certificate of satisfaction were a formal deed of release duly executed and recorded.

Release of lien by settlement agent or title insurance company.A settlement agent or title insurance company may release a deed of trust or judgment lien in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (i) if the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien has been satisfied by payment made by the settlement agent and (ii) whether or not the settlement agent or title insurance company is named as a trustee under the deed of trust or otherwise has received the authority to release the lien.

Notice to lienholder.

After or accompanying payment in full of the obligation secured by a deed of trust or judgment lien, a settlement agent or title insurance company intending to release a deed of trust or judgment lien pursuant to this subsection shall deliver to the lien creditor by certified mail or commercial overnight delivery service or the United States Postal Service, and a receipt obtained, a notice of intent to release the deed of trust or judgment lien with a copy of the payoff letter and a copy of the release to be recorded as provided in this subsection.

The notice of intent to release shall contain (i) the name of the lien creditor, the name of the servicer if loan payments on the deed of trust or judgment lien are collected by a servicer, or both names; (ii) the name of the settlement agent; (iii) the name of the title insurance company if the title insurance company intends to release the lien; and (iv) the date of the notice. The notice of intent to release shall conform substantially to the following form:

Click to view

The procedure authorized by this subsection for the release of a deed of trust or judgment lien shall constitute an optional method of accomplishing a release of a deed of trust or judgment lien secured by property in the Commonwealth. The nonuse of the procedure authorized by this subsection for the release of a deed of trust or judgment lien shall not give rise to any liability or any cause of action whatsoever against a settlement agent or any title insurance company by any obligated party or anyone succeeding to or assuming the interest of the obligated party.

NOTICE OF INTENT TO RELEASE Notice is hereby given to you concerning the deed of trust or judgment lien described on the certificate of satisfaction, a copy of which is attached to this notice, as follows: 1. The settlement agent identified below has paid the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien described herein or obtained written confirmation from you that such obligation has a zero balance. 2. The undersigned will release the deed of trust or judgment lien described in this notice unless, within 90 days from the date this notice is mailed by certified mail or commercial overnight delivery service or the United States Postal Service, and a receipt obtained, the undersigned has received by certified mail or commercial overnight delivery service or the United States Postal Service, and a receipt obtained, a notice stating that a release of the deed of trust or judgment lien has been recorded in the clerk’s office or that the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien described herein has not been paid, or the lien creditor or servicer otherwise objects to the release of the deed of trust or judgment lien. Notice shall be sent to the address stated on this form. (Name of settlement agent) (Signature of settlement agent or title insurance company) (Address of settlement agent or title insurance company) (Telephone number of settlement agent or title insurance company) (Virginia RESA registration number of settlement agent at the time the obligation was paid or confirmed to have a zero balance) 2. Certificate of satisfaction and affidavit of settlement agent or title insurance company. a. If, within 90 days following the day on which the settlement agent or title insurance company mailed or delivered the notice of intent to release in accordance with this subsection, the lien creditor or servicer does not send by certified mail or commercial overnight delivery service or the United States Postal Service, and a receipt obtained, to the settlement agent or title insurance company a notice stating that a release of the deed of trust or judgment lien has been recorded in the clerk’s office or that the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien has not been paid in full or that the lien creditor or servicer otherwise objects to the release of the deed of trust or judgment lien, the settlement agent or title insurance company may execute, acknowledge, and file with the clerk of court of the jurisdiction in which the deed of trust or judgment lien is recorded a certificate of satisfaction, which shall include (i) the affidavit described in subdivision 2 b and (ii) a copy of the notice of intent to release that was sent to the lien creditor, the servicer, or both. The certificate of satisfaction shall include the settlement agent’s RESA registration number, issued by the Virginia State Bar or the Virginia State Corporation Commission, that was in effect at the time the settlement agent paid the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien or obtained written confirmation from the lien creditor that such obligation has a zero balance. The certificate of satisfaction shall note that the individual executing the certificate of satisfaction is doing so pursuant to the authority granted by this subsection. After filing or recording the certificate of satisfaction, the settlement agent or title insurance company shall mail a copy of the certificate of satisfaction to the lien creditor or servicer. The validity of a certificate of satisfaction otherwise satisfying the requirements of this subsection shall not be affected by the inaccuracy of the RESA registration number placed thereon or the failure to mail a copy of the recorded certificate of satisfaction to the lien creditor or servicer and shall nevertheless release the deed of trust or judgment lien described therein as provided in this subsection. b. The certificate of satisfaction used by the settlement agent or title insurance company shall include an affidavit certifying (i) that the settlement agent has satisfied the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien described in the certificate, (ii) that the settlement agent or title insurance company possesses satisfactory evidence of payment of the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien described in the certificate or written confirmation from the lien creditor that such obligation has a zero balance, (iii) that the lien of the deed of trust or judgment lien may be released, (iv) that the person executing the certificate is the settlement agent or the title insurance company or is duly authorized to act on behalf of the settlement agent or title insurance company, and (v) that the notice of intent to release was delivered to the lien creditor or servicer and the settlement agent or title insurance company received evidence of receipt of such notice by the lien creditor or servicer. The affidavit shall be substantially in the following form: AFFIDAVIT OF SETTLEMENT AGENT OR TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY The undersigned hereby certifies that, in accordance with the provisions of of , as amended and in force on the date hereof (the Code), (a) the undersigned is a settlement agent or title insurance company as defined in subsection A of or a duly authorized officer, director, member, partner, or employee of such settlement agent or title insurance company; (b) the settlement agent has satisfied the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien; (c) the settlement agent or title insurance company possesses satisfactory evidence of the payment of the obligation secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien described in the certificate recorded herewith or written confirmation from the lien creditor that such obligation has a zero balance; (d) the settlement agent or title insurance company has delivered to the lien creditor or servicer in the manner specified in subdivision E 1 of the notice of intent to release and possesses evidence of receipt of such notice by the lien creditor or servicer; and (e) the lien of the deed of trust or judgment lien is hereby released. §

55.1-339

of the Code of Virginia 1950 §

55.1-339

of the Code § 55.1-339 of the Code (Authorized signer)

3.

Effect of filing.When filed or recorded with the clerk’s office, a certificate of satisfaction that is executed and notarized as provided in this subsection and accompanied by (i) the affidavit described in subdivision 2 b and (ii) a copy of the notice of intent to release that was sent to the lender, lien creditor, or servicer shall operate as a release of the encumbrance described therein and, if the encumbrance is by deed of trust, as a reconveyance of the legal title as fully and effectively as if such certificate of satisfaction were a formal deed of release duly executed and recorded.

4.

Effect of wrongful or erroneous certificate; damages.

a.

The execution and filing or recording of a wrongful or erroneous certificate of satisfaction by a settlement agent or title insurance agent does not relieve the party obligated to repay the debt, or anyone succeeding to or assuming the responsibility of the obligated party as to the debt, from any liability for the debt or other obligations secured by the deed of trust or judgment lien that is the subject of the wrongful or erroneous certificate of satisfaction.

b.

A settlement agent or title insurance agent that wrongfully or erroneously executes and files or records a certificate of satisfaction is liable to the lien creditor for actual damages sustained due to the recording of a wrongful or erroneous certificate of satisfaction.

5.

Applicability.

a.

The procedure authorized by this subsection for the release of a deed of trust may be used to effect the release of a deed of trust after July 1, 2002, regardless of when the deed of trust was created, assigned, or satisfied by payment made by the settlement agent. The procedure authorized by this subsection for the release of a judgment lien may be used to effect the release of such judgment lien after July 1, 2021, regardless of when the judgment lien was created, assigned, or satisfied by payment made by the settlement agent.

b.

This subsection applies only to transactions involving the purchase of or lending on the security of real estate located in the Commonwealth that is either (i) unimproved real estate with a lien to be released of $1 million or less or (ii) real estate containing at least one but not more than four residential dwelling units.

c.

The procedure authorized by this subsection applies only to the full and complete release of a deed of trust or judgment lien. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize the partial release of property from a deed of trust or judgment lien or otherwise permit the execution or recordation of a certificate of partial satisfaction.

History.

Code 1919, § 6456; 1926, p. 80; 1930, p. 69; 1932, p. 120; 1944, p. 198; Code 1950, § 55-66.3; 1958, c. 14; 1962, c. 39; 1972, c. 280; 1975, c. 469; 1980, c. 116; 1986, c. 462; 1987, c. 673; 1988, c. 546; 1991, c. 414; 1996, cc. 895, 949; 1997, c. 221; 2000, c. 28; 2001, c. 711; 2002, cc. 845, 862; 2003, c. 745; 2004, c. 596; 2006, c. 907; 2009, cc. 254, 421; 2010, c. 236; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 486.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 486, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for the provisions amending subsections B and G of
§

8.01-251

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 486, effective January 1, 2022, inserted “or judgment lien” throughout the section; inserted the definition for “Judgment lien” in subsection A; added the exception clause in subdivision B 1 to the beginning of the last paragraph; substituted “lien creditor” for “lender” in subdivision E 2 a, clause (ii); added the second sentence of subdivision E 5 a; and made a stylistic change.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Liens, § 18.

§ 55.1-340.
Release by financial institution upon payment of debt placed with it for collection.

In any case where a note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness placed by a creditor for collection with a bank, trust company, savings institution, small loan company, or credit union is fully paid at such financial institution, the financial institution, through its authorized agents, may execute all certificates, releases, and affidavits required of a creditor by this chapter to effectuate a release. The financial institution may execute and deliver to the clerk an affidavit to the effect that the financial institution had been acting as collecting agent for the creditor on the debt and that the debt has been paid in full at such institution.

History.

1983, c. 220, § 55-66.3:1; 1996, c. 77; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-341.
Partial satisfaction.

It is lawful for any lien creditor to record a certificate of partial satisfaction of any one or more of the separate pieces or parcels of property covered by such lien. It shall also be lawful for any such creditor to record a certificate of partial satisfaction of any part of the real estate covered by such lien if a plat of such part or a deed of such part is recorded in the clerk’s office and a cross-reference is made in the certificate of partial satisfaction to the book and page where the plat or deed of such part is recorded. Such certificate of partial satisfaction may be accomplished in manner and form prescribed in this chapter for making certificates of satisfaction, except that the creditor, or his duly authorized agent, shall make an affidavit to the clerk or in such certificate that such creditor is at the time of making such satisfaction the legal holder of the obligation, note, bond, or other evidence of debt, secured by such lien, and when made in conformity with the provisions of this chapter such partial satisfaction shall be as valid and binding as a proper release deed duly executed for the same purpose.

Any and all partial marginal releases made prior to July 1, 1966, in any county or city of the Commonwealth, in conformity with the provisions of this chapter, either of one or more separate pieces or parcels of real estate or any part of the real estate covered by such lien, or as to one or more of the obligations secured by any such lien, or as to all of the real estate covered by such lien instrument, are hereby validated and declared to be binding upon all parties in interest, but this provision shall not be construed as intended to disturb or impair any vested right.

History.

Code 1919, § 6456; 1930, p. 70; 1932, p. 121; 1944, p. 199; Code 1950, § 55-66.4; 1952, c. 469; 1966, c. 505; 1975, c. 469; 1977, c. 141; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-342.
Permissible form for certificate of satisfaction or certificate of partial satisfaction.

Any release by a certificate of satisfaction or certificate of partial satisfaction shall be in conformity with §§

55.1-339

,

55.1-340

, and

55.1-341

and shall conform substantially with the following Certificate of Satisfaction or Certificate of Partial Satisfaction forms:

CERTIFICATE OF SATISFACTION Place of Record Date of Note/Deed of Trust Face Amount Secured/Face Amount of Note: Deed Book Page Name(s) of Grantor(s)/Maker(s); Name(s) of Trustee(s) Face Amount of Note(s) $ I/we, holder(s) of the above-mentioned note(s) secured by the above-mentioned deed of trust, do hereby certify that the same has/have been paid in full, and the lien therein created and retained is hereby released. GIVEN UNDER MY/OUR HAND(S) THIS DAY OF , 20. (NOTE HOLDERS) Commonwealth of Virginia, County/City of to wit: Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me by this day of , 20. My Commission Expires: NOTARY PUBLIC Notary Registration Number: VIRGINIA; IN THE CLERK’S OFFICE OF THE CIRCUIT COURT This certificate was presented, and with the Certificate annexed, admitted to record on at o’clock .m. Clerk’s fees: $ have been paid. Attest: , Deputy Clerk CERTIFICATE OF PARTIAL SATISFACTION Place of Record Date of Deed of Trust Deed Book Page Name(s) of Grantor(s) Name(s) of Trustee(s) Maker(s) of Note(s) Date of Note(s) Face Amount of Note(s) $ The lien of the above-mentioned deed of trust securing the above-mentioned note is released insofar as the same is applicable to (description of property) recorded in deed book at page in the clerk’s office of this court. The undersigned is/are the legal holder(s) of the obligation, note, bond, or other evidence of debt secured by said deed of trust. Given under my/our hand(s) this day of , 20. (NOTE HOLDERS) Commonwealth of Virginia, County/City of to wit: Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me by this day of , 20. My Commission Expires: NOTARY PUBLIC Notary Registration Number:

Click to view

The clerk shall satisfy the requirements of §

17.1-228

.

Certificates conforming to this section prior to the amendment effective July 1, 1984, shall be deemed to be in substantial conformity to this section.

History.

1975, c. 469, § 55-66.4:1; 1977, c. 254; 1982, c. 420; 1983, c. 220; 1984, c. 376; 1990, c. 328; 1994, c. 929; 1995, c. 271; 1996, c. 949; 2014, c. 330; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-343.
Where certificates of satisfaction are to be indexed.

The clerk shall record a certificate of partial satisfaction or a certificate of satisfaction on the grantor index, both under the name of each grantor on the underlying deed of trust and under the name of the first-named trustee under which the deed of trust was indexed, all as identified on the certificate of satisfaction. The deed book and page number or the instrument number of the released deed of trust shall also be designated in the index. Any clerk using a separate index book or data file for grantees only shall also record in such book or file the name of each grantor on the underlying deed of trust as identified on the certificate of satisfaction.

History.

1985, c. 245, § 55-66.4:2; 1986, c. 512; 1997, c. 579; 2002, c. 832; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-344.
Releases made by court; costs and attorney fees.

Any person who owns or has any interest in real estate or personal property on which an encumbrance as described in §

55.1-339

exists may, after 20 days’ notice to the person entitled to such encumbrance, apply to the circuit court of the county or city in which such encumbrance is recorded to have the same released or discharged. Upon proof that the encumbrance has been paid or discharged or upon a finding by the court that more than 15 years have elapsed since the maturity of the lien or encumbrance, raising a presumption of payment that is not rebutted at the hearing, such court shall order the clerk to record a certificate of satisfaction or a certificate of partial satisfaction that, when so recorded, shall operate as a release of such encumbrance.All releases made prior to June 24, 1944, by any court under this section upon such presumption of payment so arising and not rebutted shall be validated.

If the court finds that the person entitled to such encumbrance cannot with due diligence be located, and that notice has been given such person in the manner provided by §

8.01-319

or

55.1-348

, or that tender has been made of the sum due thereon but has been refused for any reason by the party to whom due, the court may in its discretion order the sum due to be paid into court, to be there held as provided by law, and to be paid upon demand to the person entitled thereto. The court shall order the same to be recorded as provided in subsection A, and such certificate of satisfaction or certificate of partial satisfaction shall operate as a release of the encumbrance.

Upon a finding by the court that the holder of a mortgage or deed of trust that has been fully paid or discharged has unjustifiably and without good cause failed or refused to release such mortgage or deed of trust, the court may order that costs and reasonable attorney fees be paid to the petitioning party. This subsection shall not preclude a separate action by the petitioning party for actual damages sustained by reason of such failure or refusal to release the encumbrance.

History.

Code 1919, § 6456; 1926, p. 81; 1930, p. 70; 1932, p. 121; 1944, p. 199; Code 1950, § 55-66.5; 1956, c. 426; 1975, c. 469; 1987, c. 604; 1992, c. 532; 1999, c. 66; 2006, c. 907; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 6.

§ 55.1-345.
Recordation of certificate of satisfaction, etc., required when release of lien recorded.

Whenever a release of a deed of trust or other obligation is recorded in the office of the clerk of any circuit court, such clerk shall record a certificate of satisfaction or certificate of partial satisfaction, stating that such deed or other obligation is released. The fee charged by the clerk for recording such release shall be paid by the lien debtor. Such certificate shall be indexed in the name of the grantors and grantees of the instrument being released. If any clerk fails for 10 days to do anything required of him by this section, he shall be liable for any damage that any person may sustain by reason of such failure.

History.

Code 1919, § 3402; Code 1950, § 55-66.6; 1975, c. 469; 1979, c. 648; 1991, c. 414; 1993, c. 39; 2010, c. 352; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item § 3-6.01, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “There is hereby assessed a twenty dollar fee on (i) every deed for which the state recordation tax is collected pursuant to §§

58.1-801

A and

58.1-803

, Code of Virginia; and (ii) every certificate of satisfaction admitted under §

55.1-345

, Code of Virginia. The revenue generated from fifty percent of such fee shall be deposited to the general fund. The revenue generated from the other fifty percent of such fee shall be deposited to the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund, a subfund of the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund, as established in § 10.1-2128.1, Code of Virginia. The funds deposited to this subfund shall be disbursed for the agricultural best management practices cost share program, pursuant to § 10.1-2128.1, Code of Virginia.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.